Massachusetts, session 194th, H409.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the comptroller shall transfer
up to $10,000,000 each fiscal year, if the secretary of administration and finance requests in
writing, from the Race Horse Development Fund established in section 60 of chapter 23K of the
General Laws to the Community Preservation Trust Fund established in section 9 of chapter 44B
of the General Laws.
of 1